Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2600.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38-3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 38-3 entitled "Public Records
Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
38-3-4. Duties of administrator.
It shall be the duty and responsibility of the administrator to:
(1) Establish and administer a public records management program, for public bodies
which shall be primarily responsible for assisting state agencies and cities and towns with the care
and management of public records, including the operation of a record center or centers, and apply
efficient and economical management methods relating to the creation, utilization, retention,
preservation, and disposal of records or the transfer of permanent records to the state archives;
(2) Establish and administer a local government records program which shall be primarily
responsible for assisting cities and towns with the care and management of their public records.
The program shall be charged with designing and implementing a training program for local
government records keepers; publishing retention schedules for the proper disposition of public
records in local governments; and providing technical and advisory assistance in the storage,
preservation, and ongoing maintenance of the records of local governments;
(3) Analyze, develop, establish, and coordinate standards, procedures, and techniques of
record making and record keeping to ensure the access, security, and preservation of public records;
(4) Institute and maintain a training and information program including, but not limited to,
the publication of educational materials on all phases of records management to bring to the

attention of all agencies approved and current practices, methods, procedures, and devices for the
efficient and economical management of records;
(5) Make continuous surveys of record keeping operations, to examine the condition of
public records and recommend improvements to public officials in current records management
practices, space, equipment, supplies, and personnel in creating, maintaining, and making available
the public records in their custody;
(6) Establish and maintain a program, in cooperation with each agency, for the selection
and protection of public records considered essential to the operation of government and to the
protection of the rights and privileges of citizens;
(7) Create forms for records management processes and the development of the required
records control schedules submitted by an agency to the program;
(8) Create, analyze, and uphold records control schedules of public records in the custody
of state and local agencies;
(9) Establish safeguards against unauthorized or unlawful removal or loss of records;
(10) Initiate appropriate action to recover records removed unlawfully or without
authorization;
(11) Preserve and administer such public records as shall be transferred to the state archives
according to approved conservation and security practices, and to permit them to be inspected,
examined, and copied at reasonable times and under supervision of the program; provided that, any
record placed in keeping of the program under special terms or conditions restricting their use shall
be made available only in accordance with the provisions of § 38-2-2;
(12) Provide a public research room where, upon policies established by the program, the
records in the state archives may be studied;
(13) Make certified copies under seal of any records transferred to it upon the application
of any person, and sign the certificates which shall have the same force and effect as if made by the
agency from which the records were received. The program may charge a reasonable fee for this
service;
(14) Assist agencies in identifying, securing, and transferring records of permanent legal,
historical or enduring value to the state archives;
(15) Approve emergency destruction of public records which were damaged due to
catastrophic, environmental, or otherwise unforeseen circumstances and pose a risk to human
health, but have not met their established retention;
(16) Submit a yearly report on the progress of the local government records program to the
general officers and to the general assembly;
LC004948 - Page 2 of 4

(17) Request funding for the public records administration program in accordance with §
38-3-3 and for the local government records program pursuant to § 42-8.1-20(e) as part of the
operating budget of the office of secretary of state to operate the program;
(18) Render all services required by the program herein set forth that can advantageously
and effectively be centralized;
(19) Facilitate the transfer of permanent records of any state or local agency, elected
official, or of the general assembly to the state archives for permanent preservation and public
access; and
(20) Perform such other functions and duties as the secretary may direct.; and
(21) Create and adopt a uniform statewide access to public records request form, and to
promulgate consistent standards for the use of this form that is applicable to all public bodies,
consistent with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38 (“access to public records”).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004948
========
LC004948 - Page 3 of 4